Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2466
Bonds; liability; limitations.

(1) Neither the members of an agency's board nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally on such bonds by reason of the issuance thereof.

(2) The bonds shall not be a debt of any municipality or of this state and neither this state nor any municipality shall be liable thereon. Bonds shall be payable only out of any funds or properties of the issuing agency. Such limitations shall be plainly stated upon the face of the bonds.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 66.